District of Columbia statutes.
42-3508.01

Declaration of policy.

In order to assist in stimulating the expansion of the supply of decent, safe, and affordable rental housing for low- to moderate-income persons in the District, the Council declares as its policy that the Mayor and the Council shall:

(1)

Use the District’s bonding authority to provide low-interest financing for the construction of new rental units and the rehabilitation of vacant rental units; and

(2)

Provide tax abatements and other incentives for the construction of new rental units and the rehabilitation of vacant rental units.

History

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 801, 32 DCR 3089

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2581.

Expiration of Law

Section 907 of D.C. Law 6-10, as amended by § 2(d) of D.C. Law 8-48 and § 818 of D.C. Law 11-52, provided that all subchapters of the act, except III and V, shall terminate on December 31, 2000.

Editor's Notes

For temporary amendment to the termination provision of D.C. Law 6-10, see § 818 of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).

Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 2(d) of D.C. Law 10-155 provided in part that pursuant to subchapter 1 of Chapter 5 of Title 2, the Mayor shall issue rules to implement this subchapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved. Nothing in this section shall affect any requirements imposed upon the Mayor by subchapter 1 of Chapter 5 of Title 2.